src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
!LEXICON TV_CHIOPSTED !!= * @CODE@ čiõpsted:čiõppâst
!+TV: V0_CHIOPSTED ;
LEXICON V0_CHIOPSTED !!= * @CODE@ čiõpsted:čiõppâst
!!! inflection_type="3"
:%^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; ! čiõppâst
: VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;        ! čiõppâst
:%^Pen%^CC2CAllegro%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;           ! čiõpsted
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;           ! čiõppsted

LEXICON V_TAARBSHED !!= * @CODE@ taarbšed:taarbâš
: V0_TAARBSHED ;
!LEXICON IV_TAARBSHED !!= * @CODE@ taarbšed:taarbâš
!+IV: V0_TAARBSHED ;
!LEXICON TV_TAARBSHED !!= * @CODE@ taarbšed:taarbâš
!+TV: V0_TAARBSHED ;
LEXICON V0_TAARBSHED !!= * @CODE@ taarbšed:taarbâš
!!! inflection_type="3"
! No Gradation
! similar_to: V_KAEIGGSHED
! š:ž
:%^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ;	! taarbaš
:%^VC VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;        	! taarbâž
:%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;                  ! taarbšed

LEXICON V_KHIORGGNED
: V0_KHIORGGNED ;
LEXICON IV_KHIORGGNED
+IV: V0_KHIORGGNED ;
LEXICON TV_KHIORGGNED
+TV: V0_KHIORGGNED ;
LEXICON V0_KHIORGGNED
!!! inflection_type="3"
! Gradation: none
! ǩiõrggned:ǩiõrggân
! (ij ǩiõrggân) %^RmVow
! ǩiõrggned:ǩiõrggân
! FORMS
! (1) +V+Inf: ǩiõrggned
!   Ind.Prs.Pl1-Pl2, Ind.Prt.ConNeg
!   Imprt.Pl1-Pl2-Pl3, ActEss, Actio, PrsPrc, PrfPrc
! (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ǩiõrggan
! (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ǩiõrggne
! (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ǩiõrggne
!   Ind.Prt.Sg1-Sg2-4
! (5) +V+Imprt+Sg2: ǩiõrggân
!   Ind.Prs.Sg1-Sg2-4-ConNeg
!   Ind.Prt.Sg3-Pl1-Pl2
!   Imprt.2.ConNeg
!   VAbe, GerTemp, GerInstr
!   Cond-Pot
! (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: ǩiõrggnež
! (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: ǩiõrggnââǥǥas
! (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: ǩiõrggnuku
!    Pass.PrfPrc
:%^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; ! ǩiõrggan
: VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;        ! ǩiõrggân
:%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;           ! ǩiõrggned



!! ### CLASS 2 LOW VOWEL, NO PALATALIZATION
LEXICON V_VUEJTED !!= * @CODE@ vuejted:vuejat
: V0_VUEJTED ;
!LEXICON IV_VUEJTED !!= * @CODE@ vuejted:vuejat
!+IV: V0_VUEJTED ;
LEXICON TV_VUEJTED !!= * @CODE@ vuejted:vuejat
+TV: V0_VUEJTED ;
+V+TV+Der+Der/oottyd+V+IV:%^RmVow»õõtt IV_LAUKKOOLLYD ;
LEXICON V0_VUEJTED !!= * @CODE@ vuejted:vuejat
!!! inflection_type="3"
! lexicon ''@LEXNAME@'' 
! FORMS
! (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuejat
:%^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3  ;  !2 vuejat

! (5) +V+Imprt+Sg2:  vuejat
!   V.Imprt.2.ConNeg, V.Ind.Prs.ConNeg
: VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;

! (1) +V+Inf: vuejted
!   Ind.Prs.Pl1-Pl2, Ind.Prt.ConNeg
!   Imprt.Pl1-Pl2-Pl3, ActEss, Actio, PrsPrc, PrfPrc
! (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vuejte
! (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vuejte
!   Ind.Prt.Sg1-Sg2-4
! (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: vuejtež
! (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: vuejtââǥǥas
! (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: vuejtuku
!    Pass.PrfPrc

!   Ind.Prs.Sg1-Sg2-4-ConNeg
!   Ind.Prt.Sg3-Pl1-Pl2
!   VAbe, GerTemp, GerInstr
!   Cond-Pot
:%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;

LEXICON VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%^PALNo K ;

LEXICON VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%^PALNo	K ;
+Imprt+Sg2:%^PALNo		K ;
+Imprt+ConNeg:%^PALNo 	K ;

LEXICON VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE
 VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-PAL ;
  VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-NOPAL ;
LEXICON VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-PAL
+Inf:%>ed K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>ep  K  ; 
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>eʹped K  ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>e     K  ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>e              K  ; ! vuejte
+Ind+Prs+Sg4:%>et K ; !

+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>em             K  ; ! vuejtem
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>iǩ             K  ; ! vuejtiǩ
+Ind+Prt+Sg2+Err/Orth-k-kh:%>ik             K  ; ! vuejtiǩ
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i              K  ; ! ! vuejti
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>im             K  ; ! ! vuejtim
+Ind+Prt+Pl1+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>in      K  ; ! vuejtin
+Ind+Prt+Pl1+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>iim      K  ; ! vuejtiim
+Ind+Prt+Pl1+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>iin      K  ; ! vuejtiin
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>id             K  ; ! ! vuejtid
+Ind+Prt+Pl2+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>iid      K  ; ! vuejtiid
+Ind+Prt+Sg4:%>eš K ; ! vuejteš
+Imprt+Pl2:%>eʹǩed           K  ;
:%>eʹ		VSUF-I-POTKOND ; !WG
+Use/NGminip+Use/SpellNoSugg:%>eʹč CONDITIONAL ;
+Pot+Sg3:%>ež	K ; !WG
+Actio+Ess:%>eʹmmen K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/SpellNoSugg+Actio+Ess:%>eʹmen K ;
+Actio:%>em K ;
@C.NeedNoun@+Der+Der/NomAct+N:@C.NeedNoun@%>em N_AANAR ; ! XXX Actio
+Der+Der/NomAct+Der+Der/nalla+Adv:%>em»nalla K ; ! XXX Actio
+Act+PrsPrc:%>eei K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Act+PrsPrc:%>eeʹjj K ;
!+Act+PrsPrc+Der+Der/N:%>ee N_PRSPRC-EEI ;
@C.NeedNoun@+Der+Der/NomAg+N:@C.NeedNoun@%>ee N_PRSPRC-EEI ;
:e VABESS ;
 GER_ ;
+Der+Der/InchL+V:%>e»škuätt V_SHKUEAQTTED ;

LEXICON VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-NOPAL
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>am  K  ;  ! vuejtam
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>ak  K  ; !
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>am K ; ! vuejtam
+Use/NGminip+Use/SpellNoSugg+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>amma K ; ! vuejtamma

+Imprt+Sg3:%>ââǥǥas          K  ; !WG
+Imprt+Pl1:%>âkap                    K  ;
+Imprt+Pl3:%>âkaz            K  ;

+Imprt+ConNegII:%>uku K ;
+Err/Orth+Imprt+ConNegII+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>ukku K ;
+Act+PrfPrc:%>am K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/SpellNoSugg+Act+PrfPrc:%>amma K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc:%>ummu K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc:%>um K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/SpellNoSugg+Pass+PrfPrc:%>uum K ;
 DEVERBAL-NOUN_ummush ;
+Der+Der/Caus+V:â%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}tt TV_KAEQTTED ;
+Der+Der/st+V:â%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}stt V_CEQPCCED ;
+Der+Der/oottyd+V:»õõtt IV_LAUKKOOLLYD ;
+Der+Der/oollyd+V:»õõll V_LAUKKOOLLYD ;
+Der+Der/oovvyd+V:»õõvv V_LAUKKOOLLYD ;


LEXICON V_KAEIGGSHED !!= * @CODE@ käiggšed:käiggaš
: V0_KAEIGGSHED ;
LEXICON IV_KAEIGGSHED !!= * @CODE@ käiggšed:käiggaš
+IV: V0_KAEIGGSHED ;
!LEXICON TV_KAEIGGSHED !!= * @CODE@ käiggšed:käiggaš
!+TV: V0_KAEIGGSHED ;
LEXICON V0_KAEIGGSHED !!= * @CODE@ käiggšed:käiggaš
!!! inflection_type="3"
! No Gradation
! similar_to: V_TAARBSHED
! ž:š
:%^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ;	! käiggaš
:%^VC VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;        	! käiggaž
:%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;                  ! käiggšed


LEXICON V_JAELSTED !!= * @CODE@ jälsted:jäälast
: V0_JAELSTED ;
LEXICON IV_JAELSTED !!= * @CODE@ jälsted:jäälast
+IV: V0_JAELSTED ;
!LEXICON TV_JAELSTED !!= * @CODE@ jälsted:jäälast
!+TV: V0_JAELSTED ;
LEXICON V0_JAELSTED !!= * @CODE@ jälsted:jäälast
!!! inflection_type="3"
! lexicon ''@LEXNAME@''
!
! * Yaml: __V-jaelsted__

:%^PenVow2a%^PALNo VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; ! jäälast
:%^PALNo VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;      	 ! jäälast
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ; 		 ! jälsted
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ; 		 ! jäälsted


LEXICON V_JAEMLJED !!= * @CODE@ jämljed:jäämalǥ
: V0_JAEMLJED ;
!LEXICON IV_JAEMLJED !!= * @CODE@ jämljed:jäämalǥ
!+IV: V0_JAEMLJED ;
!LEXICON TV_JAEMLJED !!= * @CODE@ jämljed:jäämalǥ
!+TV: V0_JAEMLJED ;
LEXICON V0_JAEMLJED !!= * @CODE@ jämljed:jäämalǥ
!! inflection_type="3"
! lexicon ''@LEXNAME@''
!
! * Yaml: __V-jaelsted ǥ:j__

:%^PenVow2a%^PALK VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; ! jäämalj
:%^PALNo VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;      	 ! jäämalǥ
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^RmVow%^PALK VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-PAL ; 		 ! jämlj
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^RmVow%^PALK VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-PAL ; 		 ! jäämlj
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^RmVow%^PALK VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-NOPAL ; 		 ! jämlj
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^RmVow%^PALK VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-NOPAL ; 		 ! jäämlj


LEXICON V_POAGXSTED !!= * @CODE@ påǥsted:pååǥǥast
: V0_POAGXSTED ;
!LEXICON IV_POAGXSTED !!= * @CODE@ påǥsted:pååǥǥast
!+IV: V0_POAGXSTED ;
!LEXICON TV_POAGXSTED !!= * @CODE@ påǥsted:pååǥǥast
!+TV: V0_POAGXSTED ;
LEXICON V0_POAGXSTED !!= * @CODE@ påǥsted:pååǥǥast
!!! inflection_type="3"
! lexicon ''@LEXNAME@''
! * Yaml: __V-poagsted__
:%^PenVow2a%^PALNo VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; ! pååǥǥast
:%^PALNo VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;      	 ! pååǥǥast
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^Pen%^CC2CAllegro%^RmVow%^PALK VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-PAL ; 	! påǥsted râdsǩed
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^Pen%^CC2CAllegro%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-NOPAL ; 	! påǥsted
!:%^Pen%^VV2V%^Pen%^CC2C%^RmVow%^PALK VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-PAL ; 	! påǥsted râdsǩed
!:%^Pen%^VV2V%^Pen%^CC2C%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-NOPAL ; 	! påǥsted
+Err/Orth:%^Pen%^CC2CAllegro%^RmVow%^PALK VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-PAL ; 	 ! pååǥsted
+Err/Orth:%^Pen%^CC2CAllegro%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-NOPAL ; 	 ! pååǥsted
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^RmVow%^PALK VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-PAL ; 	 ! pååǥǥsted
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-NOPAL ; 	 ! pååǥǥsted
!! lepsted+V+Inf
!!€ lẹẹppast^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2CAllegro^RmVow
!!€ lẹ0p00st^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2CAllegro^RmVow


LEXICON V_JOARGXSTED !!= * @CODE@ jårǥsted:jåårǥast
: V0_JOARGXSTED ;
LEXICON IV_JOARGXSTED !!= * @CODE@ jårǥsted:jåårǥast
+IV: V0_JOARGXSTED ;
!LEXICON TV_JOARGXSTED !!= * @CODE@ jårǥsted:jåårǥast
!+TV: V0_JOARGXSTED ;
LEXICON V0_JOARGXSTED !!= * @CODE@ jårǥsted:jåårǥast
!!! inflection_type="3"
! lexicon ''@LEXNAME@''
! * Yaml: __V-poagsted__
:%^PenVow2a%^PALNo VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; ! jåårǥast
:%^PALNo VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;        ! jåårǥast
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^RmVow%^PALK VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-PAL ;                 ! jårǥsted
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-NOPAL ;                 ! jårǥsted
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^RmVow%^PALK VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-PAL ;                 ! jåårǥsted
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-NOPAL ;                 ! jåårǥsted

LEXICON V_TEYPSTED !!= * @CODE@ teâpsted:teâ%{ˈ1%}ppast
: V0_TEYPSTED ;
LEXICON IV_TEYPSTED !!= * @CODE@ teâpsted:teâ%{ˈ1%}ppast
+IV: V0_TEYPSTED ;
LEXICON TV_TEYPSTED !!= * @CODE@ teâpsted:teâ%{ˈ1%}ppast
+TV: V0_TEYPSTED ;
LEXICON V0_TEYPSTED !!= * @CODE@ teâpsted:teâ%{ˈ1%}ppast
!!! inflection_type="3"
!! gradation: no
!! allegro: yes
!! similar_to: 
! lexicon ''@LEXNAME@''
! * Yaml: __V-teapsted__
:%^PenVow2a%^PALNo VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; ! teâppast
:%^PALNo VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;        ! teâppast, ǩeä%{ˈ1%}ssast
:%^Pen%^CC2CAllegro%^RmVow%^PALK VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-PAL ; ! teâpsted reämšǩ-
:%^Pen%^CC2CAllegro%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-NOPAL ;	 ! teâpsted reämšk-
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^RmVow%^PALK VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-PAL ; ! teâppsted reämmšǩ-
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-NOPAL ;	 ! teâppsted reämmšk-


LEXICON V_JEAELSTED !!= * @CODE@ jeälsted:jeälast
: V0_JEAELSTED ;
LEXICON IV_JEAELSTED !!= * @CODE@ jeälsted:jeälast
+IV: V0_JEAELSTED ;
LEXICON TV_JEAELSTED !!= * @CODE@ jeälsted:jeälast
+TV: V0_JEAELSTED ;
LEXICON V0_JEAELSTED !!= * @CODE@ jeälsted:jeälast
!!! inflection_type="3"
!! gradation: no
!! allegro: yes
!! similar_to: 
! lexicon ''@LEXNAME@''
! * Yaml: __V-teapsted__
:%^PenVow2a%^PALNo VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; ! jeälast
:%^PALNo VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;        ! jeälast
:%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;  ! jeälsted

LEXICON V_CVICCKHED !!= * @CODE@  cviccǩed:cviccâk
: V0_CVICCKHED ;
!LEXICON IV_CVICCKHED !!= * @CODE@  cviccǩed:cviccâk
!+IV: V0_CVICCKHED ;
!LEXICON TV_CVICCKHED !!= * @CODE@  cviccǩed:cviccâk
!+TV: V0_CVICCKHED ;
LEXICON V0_CVICCKHED !!= * @CODE@  cviccǩed:cviccâk
!!! inflection_type="3"
!! gradation: no
! lexicon ''@LEXNAME@''
:%^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; ! cviccak
: VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;        ! cviccâk
:%^RmVow%^PALK VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-PAL ;		 ! cviccǩ
:%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-NOPAL ;		 ! cvicck


LEXICON V_MUAERSKHED !!= * @CODE@ muärsǩed:muärask
: V0_MUAERSKHED ;
!LEXICON IV_MUAERSKHED !!= * @CODE@ muärsǩed:muärask
!+IV: V0_MUAERSKHED ;
!LEXICON TV_MUAERSKHED !!= * @CODE@ muärsǩed:muärask
!+TV: V0_MUAERSKHED ;
LEXICON V0_MUAERSKHED !!= * @CODE@ muärsǩed:muärask
!! inflection_type="3"
!! gradation: no
!! allegro: yes
!! similar_to: 
! lexicon ''@LEXNAME@''
! * Yaml: __V-jeästed but k:ǩ__
:%^PenVow2a%^PALNo VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; ! muärask
:%^PALNo VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;        ! muärask
:%^RmVow%^PALK VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-PAL ;  ! muärsǩ
:%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-NOPAL ;  ! muärsk

LEXICON V_TOINXSKHED !!= * @CODE@ tõiŋsǩed:tõõiŋâsk
: V0_TOINXSKHED ;
